District of Columbia statutes.
24-613

Evaluations and recommendations by Mayor; publications; comprehensive plan.

(a)

The Mayor shall maintain a continuing evaluation of his programs and shall conduct pilot and demonstration projects to improve his programs, shall from time to time submit to the Congress such recommendations for programs for the District of Columbia to further the rehabilitation of chronic alcoholics, prevent the excessive and abusive use of alcoholic beverages, and promote moderation in the use of such beverages.

(b)

The Mayor shall prepare and publish materials, data, information, and statistics that relate to the problems of intoxication and alcoholism in the District of Columbia and that may be used in a program of public education directed toward the prevention of the excessive and abusive use of alcoholic beverages.

(c)

The Mayor shall develop a comprehensive plan to implement the objectives and policies of this subchapter, and in so doing shall consult and collaborate with appropriate public and private agencies, institutions, and organizations in the District of Columbia, and with the Secretary of Health and Human Services. In developing such plan, the Mayor shall make every effort to utilize funds, programs, and facilities authorized under federal legislation.

Aug. 4, 1947, 61 Stat. 746, ch. 472, § 13
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 623, Pub. L. 90-452, § 3(a)
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
The functions of the Department of Health, Education and Welfare was transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services by the Act of October 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 675, Pub. L. 96-88, § 509.
1973 Ed., § 24-533.
1981 Ed., § 24-533.